Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1535.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1531 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1531. Grading, Classification and Promotion of Pupils.--(a) Teachers in the public schools shall, under the direction of the proper superintendents of schools, grade and classify the pupils in their schools so that they may pursue the courses of study herein provided for, and all pupils found proficient may be promoted twice each year.(b) The following shall apply:(1) No later than one hundred eighty ( 180) days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall 123456789101112131415161718192021 establish individual student performance levels aligned with the PSSA test to identify the levels of individual performance:(i) sufficient to demonstrate proficiency relative to the State academic standards;(ii) sufficient to demonstrate advanced achievement relative to the State academic standards; and(iii) insufficient to demonstrate proficiency relative to the State academic standards and requiring academic improvement.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may approve alternative indicators of student performance in determining proficiency relative to State academic standards within the time period specified under paragraph (1). Approved indicators shall meet all of the following criteria:(i) Provide valid measures of student achievement aligned with State academic standards.(ii) Include, but not be limited to, performance on school entity-administered assessments, end-of-course assessments, student work products or classroom grades substantiated by student work demonstrating achievement levels.(3) Performance levels or indicators established under this subsection shall indicate whether a student is more than three (3) years below proficiency in reading or more than four (4) years below proficiency in mathematics.(4) A student in grade three, four, five, six, seven or eight whose performance on the reading portion of the PSSA test indicates that the student is more than three (3) years below proficiency shall not be promoted to the next grade level unless any of the following apply:(i) The student's parent or guardian and the school entity agree to an individual improvement plan that may include, but is 20250HB1535PN1798 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not limited to, summer school, before or after school instruction, Saturday school or tutoring.(ii) The student has previously been retained for academic reasons for two (2) school years.(5) A student in grade three, four, five, six, seven or eight whose performance on the mathematics portion of the PSSA test indicates that the student is more than four (4) years below proficiency shall not be promoted to the next grade level unless any of the following apply:(i) The student's parent or guardian and the school entity agree to an individual improvement plan that may include, but is not limited to, summer school, before or after school instruction, Saturday school or tutoring.(ii) The student has previously been retained for academic reasons for two school years.(6) A student who continues to demonstrate inadequate performance following a retention year may not be retained for an additional year but shall be provided with an individual improvement plan developed by the school entity in accordance with department regulations. An individual improvement plan shall specify a course of study and required academic improvement activities, which may include summer school, additional instruction or mentoring programs.(7) To the extent that results from the PSSA test are unavailable, the school entity shall use alternative means to identify students at risk of not achieving proficiency and develop individual improvement plans accordingly.(8) The department may require a school entity to implement academic improvement activities for a student identified as not proficient under this subsection, including, but not limited to, 20250HB1535PN1798 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional instructional time or mentoring.(9) A school entity may require student participation in academic improvement activities in accordance with department regulations or the school entity's academic policies. A student who fails to comply with required academic improvement activities may be subject to the same disciplinary measures applicable to acts of truancy or absenteeism.(10) An academic review committee shall be established by each school entity to hear parent or guardian appeals regarding the contents of an individual improvement plan. The committee shall include at least one teacher from the grade level to which the student may be promoted.(11) Paragraphs (4) and (5) shall not apply if the student has been formally classified as having any of the following:(i) A moderate intellectual disability.(ii) A severe intellectual disability.(iii) Autism accompanied by intellectual functioning equivalent to a moderate or severe intellectual disability.(iv) Multiple disabilities accompanied by intellectual functioning equivalent to a moderate or severe intellectual disability.(12) The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this subsection.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter 20250HB1535PN1798 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school, regional charter school or multiple charter school organization."Student." A student enrolled in grades three through eight in any school entity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1535PN1798 - 5 - 12345